Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.940

Elective adoption.

Any county or counties presently operating under the provisions of chapter 35.63 RCW may elect to operate henceforth under the provisions of this chapter. Such election shall be effected by the adoption of an ordinance under the procedure prescribed by RCW 36.32.120(7), and by compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.940. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 94.]